apertium-kan.kan.lexc
LEXICON 				ಪಡು__vaux!patta pg214
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಪಡುತ್ತಿದ್ದೆ # ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಪಡುತ್ತದೆ # ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಪಡುತ್ತವೆ # ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ಮಾದರಿಯದು # ;!
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ಪಡುತ್ತಾರೆ # ;!
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<inf%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಪಡುತ್ತಿದ್ದ #;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ಪಟ್ಟ # ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ಪಟ್ಟಿತು # ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<inf%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಪಡುವ # ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<ger%>%<nom%>:ಪಡುವುದು # ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>%<cni%>:ಪಡದಿದ್ದರೆ # ;

%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಪಡಿಸಲಾಗುವುದು # ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಪಡಿಸು # ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಪಡಿಸಿಕೊಂಡ # ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಪಡಿಸಿ kondu  ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಪಡಿಸುವ # ;!adjectival
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ಪಡಿಸಿದರು # ;

%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<neg%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಪಡಲಾರವು # ;!

%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ಪಡ beku ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ಪಡಯ bahudu ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ಪಟ್ಟ ide__vaux ;!
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಪಟ್ಟ ante ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<cause%>:ಪಡಿಸ loo ;
%+ಪಡು%<vaux%>%<inf%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಪಟ್ಟ ante ;


LEXICON 				ಪಡುತ್ತಿದ್ದೆ__vaux
%<v%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<mf%>:ಡುತ್ತಿದ್ದೆ # ;

LEXICON Golisu__v			!golisu
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<imp%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಗೊಂಡು #;
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<imp%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಗೊಳಿಸು #;
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<past%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಗೊಳಿಸಿತು #;
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಗೊಳಿಸ loo;
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಗೊಳ್ಳ loo;
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಗೊಳ್ಳುವ #;
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಗೊಳ್ಳುತ್ತದೆ #;
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<past%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಗೊಳಿಸಿದ #;
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<fut%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಗೊಳಿಸುತ್ತದೆ #;!ಗೊಂಡಿತು
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<past%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಗೊಂಡಿತು #;
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<past%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ಗೊಂಡರು #;
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<past%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ಗೊಂಡಿದ್ದರು #;
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<past%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಗೊಂಡಿದ್ದವು #;
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<ger%>%<nom%>:ಗೊಳಿಸುವುದು #;
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<ger%>%<acc%>:ಗೊಳಿಸುವುದನ್ನು #;!ನೇಮಕ
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<past%>%<acc%>:ಗೊಂಡಿದೆ #;!
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<apt%>%<past%>:ಗೊಂಡ #;!
%+ಗೊಳಿಸು%<v%>%<past%>:ಗೊಂಡಿರುವ #;!


LEXICON  				ಗೆದ್ದ__v
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>:ದ್ದ # ;!ಗೆದ್ದಿದ್ದಾರೆ
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ದ್ದಿದ್ದಾರೆ # ;!ಗೆ
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ದ್ದಿತು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ದ್ದು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<refl%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ದ್ದುಕೊಂಡರು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mfn%>:ದ್ದರು # ;!ಗೆಲ್ಲುವ
%<v%>%<inf%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಲ್ಲುವ # ;!
%<v%>%<inf%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಲ್ಲ loo ;!

%<v%>%<past%>%<refl%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ದ್ದುಕೊಂಡಿತು # ;

%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>:ದ್ದ aaga ;


LEXICON 				ಬೇಕು__v!want
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>		:ಾದ 		# ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<imp%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>	:ು 		# ;!imperitive
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>			:ಾಗುವ 	# ;
%<v%>%<npst%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>			:ಾಗುತ್ತದೆ # ;!non past ಾಗುತ್ತಿರುವ
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>			:ಾಗುತ್ತಿರುವ # ;!
%<v%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>			:ಾಗುತ್ತವೆ # ;!
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>			:ಾಗಿತ್ತು # ;!
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>			:ಾಯಿತು # ;!non past
%<v%>%<inf%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>			:ಿತ್ತು 	# ;
%<v%>%<inf%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>			:ಾದರ oo__inc_clit ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>			:ಾಗಿದೆ		# ;!ಾಗಿರುತ್ತದೆ
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>			:ಾಗಿ		# ;!
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>			:ಾಗಿರುತ್ತದೆ	# ;!ಿರುವ
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>			:ಿರುವ # ;!


LEXICON 				ದೊರೆತ__v
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ತ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ತು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಯಿತು # ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಯುವ # ;!Present-future adjectival participle
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಕುವ # ;!Present-future adjectival participle
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ತು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ತಿವೆ # ;!
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಕಿದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಕಿವೆ # ;
%<v%>%<advrb%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಕಿರುವ # ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಕುತ್ತದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ತಿದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<npst%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಯುತ್ತದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<npst%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಯುತ್ತವೆ # ;
%<v%>%<ifut%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<nt%>:ಯಲಾಗುವುದು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಕಿತು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>:ತ illa ;

%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ತಿ ide__vaux ;

%<v%>%<cause%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಸ loo ;


LEXICON 				ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಟ್ಟು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಟ್ಟಿತು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ಟ್ಟಿದ್ದಾರೆ # ;!ಟ್ಟಿದ್ದಾರೆ
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ಟ್ಟಿದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ಟ್ಟಿದರು # ;
%<v%>%<inf%>%<pp%>:ಟ್ಟಲಾದ # ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಟ್ಟುವ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಟ್ಟ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mfn%>:ಟ್ಟರು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಟ್ಟಿ # ;!
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಟ್ಟಿ kondu ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಟ್ಟಿರುವ # ;!
%<v%>%<cause%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಟ್ಟಿಸಿದ # ;!ಟ್ಟಿದ
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಟ್ಟಿದಿ # ;!
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>%<cni%>:ಟ್ಟರೆ # ;
!%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<mfn%>:ದ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಟ್ಟಿತ್ತು # ;

%<v%>%<inf%>%<past%>:ಟ್ಟಲಾಯಿತು # ;

%<v%>%<inf%>:ಟ್ಟಲಾಗಿದೆ # ;
%<v%>%<apt%>%<neg%>:ಡದ # ;

%<v%>%<past%>%<refl%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಟ್ಟಿಕೊಂಡಿತು # ;!
%<v%>%<past%>%<refl%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಟ್ಟುಕೊಂಡು # ;!
%<v%>%<past%>%<refl%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nt%>:ಟ್ಟಿಕೊಂಡು # ;!
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಡ loo ;
%<v%>%<apt%>%<past%>:ಟ್ಟಿದ # ;!


%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಟ್ಟ loo  ;

LEXICON 				ಹೊರಟ__v
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಟ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<mf%>:ಟರು # ;
%<v%>%<fut%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಡುವ # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ಟು # ;
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<m%>:ಟಿದ # ;

LEXICON 				ಎತ್ತು__v
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ತ್ತಿ # ;
%<v%>%<imp%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ತ್ತು # ;

LEXICON  				ಅರಿತು__v
%<v%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<sp%>%<mfn%>:ತು # ;
%<v%>%<apt%>%<past%>:ತ # ;

LEXICON NounRoot
ಅರಿತು:ಅರಿ 								ಅರಿತು__v;
ಕೊಟ್ಟು:ಕೊ 								ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;!Give
ತಂದುಕೊಟ್ಟು:ತಂದುಕೊ 						ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;
ಕಟ್ಟು:ಕ 									ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;!
ಬಿಟ್ಟು:ಬಿ 								ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;
ಸುಟ್ಟು:ಸು 								ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;
ಹುಟ್ಟು:ಹು 								ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;
ಇಟ್ಟು:ಇ 									ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;	
ನೆಟ್ಟು:ನೆ 									ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;
ಒಳಪಡು:ಒಳಪ 								ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;				
ಮಾರ್ಪಡು:ಮಾರ್ಪ							ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;		
ಸರಿಪಡು:ಸರಿಪ 								ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;		
ಪ್ರಕಟಪಡು:ಪ್ರಕಟಪ							ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;		
ಪ್ರಸ್ತುತಪಡು:ಪ್ರಸ್ತುತಪ						ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;		
ನಾಶಪಡು:ನಾಶಪ								ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;		
ತಿಳಿಯಪಡು:ತಿಳಿಯಪ							ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;		
ತೃಪ್ತಿಪಡು:ತೃಪ್ತಿಪ							ಕೊಟ್ಟು__v;		
ಎತ್ತು:ಎ 									ಎತ್ತು__v;
ಕಿತ್ತು:ಕಿ									ಎತ್ತು__v;
ಬಿತ್ತು:ಬಿ									ಎತ್ತು__v;
ಗೆದ್ದ:ಗೆ 									ಗೆದ್ದ__v;
ಬಿದ್ದ:ಬಿ 								ಗೆದ್ದ__v;
ಕೊಂದು:ಕೊ 								ಗೆದ್ದ__v;!rep2
ಹೊರಟ:ಹೊರ                           		ಹೊರಟ__v;
ದೊರೆತ:ದೊರೆ 								ದೊರೆತ__v;
ಚಾಲಿತ:ಚಾಲಿ 								ದೊರೆತ__v;
ದೊರಕಿತು:ದೊರ								ದೊರೆತ__v;	
ನಿಂತು:ನಿಂ  								ದೊರೆತ__v;
ನಿಗದಿ:ನಿಗದಿ 								ದೊರೆತ__v;
ಕಲಿ:ಕಲಿ 									ದೊರೆತ__v;!rep 
ಹೊತ್ತು:ಹೊತ್ 								ದೊರೆತ__v;
ಪ್ರಕಟಿ:ಪ್ರಕಟಿ 							ದೊರೆತ__v;
ಬೆರೆ:ಬೆರೆ 									ದೊರೆತ__v;!Mix
ಮರೆ:ಮರೆ 									ದೊರೆತ__v;
ಒಳಗೊಳ್ಳು:ಒಳ 							Golisu__v;!goli
ಪಾಲುಗೊಳ್ಳು:ಪಾಲ್ 						Golisu__v;
ಕೈಗೊಂಡ:ಕೈ								Golisu__v;
ಕೊನೆಗೊಂಡ:ಕೊನೆ 							Golisu__v;
ರೂಪುಗೊಂಡ:ರೂಪು 						Golisu__v;
ಪ್ರಕಟಗೊಂಡ:ಪ್ರಕಟ 						Golisu__v;!rep
ಪಡುತ್ತಿದ್ದೆ:ಪ								ಪಡುತ್ತಿದ್ದೆ__vaux;
